Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/ga.dic
aclaím/HUC
adharcálaim/HUI
aerálaim/HUI
aerálainn/J
aerthriomaínn/F
agraím/HUC
aifrím/HUC
ailléidínn/F
áillím/HUC
aimsím/HUC
ainlínn/F
ainmním/HUC
airím/HUC
aischéimnínn/F
aisdúichím/HUC
aistarraingím/HUC
aithnínn/F
aithrisím/HUC
allmhairím/HUC
amaínn/F
amplaím/HUC
aoirím/HUC
aosaínn/F
aothaím/HUC
armálaim/HUI
asaltaím/HUC
ascnaínn/F
aslaím/HUC
athaontaím/HUC
athbhunaínn/F
athbhútálaim/HUI
athbhútálainn/J
athcheartaím/HUC
athchomhairlím/HUC
athchúrsálaim/HUI
athdheilbhínn/F
athdheimhním/HUC
athphlandálaim/HUI
athphlandálainn/J
athraím/HUC
atosaínn/F
atreoraím/HUC
babhlálaim/USI
babhtálaim/USI
bácálaim/USI
badrálaim/USI
baghcatálaim/USI
baiceálaim/USI
bailím/USC
balúnaím/USC
baoiteálaim/USI
barrchaolaím/USC
beangaím/USC
bhabhtálainn/JU
bhadrálainn/JU
bhaiceálainn/JU
bhalúnaínn/FU
bhaoiteálainn/JU
bheangaínn/FU
bhisínn/FU
bhlocálainn/JU
bhocsálainn/JU
bholtanaínn/FU
bhordálainn/JU
bhrandálainn/JU
bhreathnaínn/FU
bhrostaínn/FU
bhruiseálainn/JU
bhúclálainn/JU
bhurlálainn/JU
bisím/USC
blocálaim/USI
bocsálaim/USI
boltanaím/USC
bordálaim/USI
brandálaim/USI
breathnaím/USC
brostaím/USC
bruiseálaim/USI
búclálaim/USI
burlálaim/USI
cácálaim/USI
cáilím/USC
calabraím/USC
campálaim/USI
cantálaim/USI
carcraím/USC
ceáfrálaim/USI
cealaím/USC
céimním/USC
chácálainn/JU
cháilínn/FU
chalabraínn/FU
champálainn/JU
chantálainn/JU
charcraínn/FU
cheáfrálainn/JU
chealaínn/FU
chéimnínn/FU
chiceálainn/JU
chíorlálainn/JU
chiorraínn/FU
chlasaínn/FU
chluicheálainn/JU
chlutharaínn/FU
chocálainn/JU
chodlaínn/FU
chóimeálainn/JU
choimisiúnaínn/FU
chóireálainn/JU
choirtínn/FU
chomhcheanglaínn/FU
chomhghríosaínn/FU
chomhthacaínn/FU
chonálainn/JU
chorpraínn/FU
chostálainn/JU
chrágálainn/JU
chrampálainn/JU
chranraínn/FU
chreimseálainn/JU
chríochnaínn/FU
chrosálainn/JU
chrosphóraínn/FU
chrúcálainn/JU
chúblálainn/JU
chuileálainn/JU
chuimhnínn/FU
chúlaínn/FU
chúnantaínn/FU
chúplálainn/JU
ciceálaim/USI
cíorlálaim/USI
ciorraím/USC
clasaím/USC
cluicheálaim/USI
clutharaím/USC
cocálaim/USI
codlaím/USC
cóimeálaim/USI
coimisiúnaím/USC
cóireálaim/USI
coirtím/USC
comhchruinním/USC
comhlánaím/USC
comhtharlaím/USC
conálaim/USI
corpraím/USC
costálaim/USI
crágálaim/USI
crampálaim/USI
cranraím/USC
creimseálaim/USI
críochnaím/USC
crosálaim/USI
crosphóraím/USC
crúcálaim/USI
cúblálaim/USI
cuileálaim/USI
cuimhním/USC
cúlaím/USC
cúnantaím/USC
cúplálaim/USI
d'achtálainn/JU
d'admhaínn/FU
d'aerálainn/JU
d'aighnínn/FU
d'ainéistéisínn/FU
d'áirínn/FU
d'aistrínn/FU
d'altaínn/FU
d'aonraínn/FU
d'asamhlaínn/FU
d'athbhreithnínn/FU
d'athbhútálainn/JU
d'athchuimhnínn/FU
d'athphlandálainn/JU
d'athshlánaínn/FU
d'eaglaínn/FU
d'earcaínn/FU
d'éigiontaínn/FU
d'eispéirínn/FU
d'eitseálainn/JU
d'fhadaínn/F
d'fhálaínn/F
d'fhaoileálainn/J
d'fheargaínn/F
d'fhilléadaínn/F
d'fhíréanaínn/F
d'fhodhálainn/J
d'fhoghlaínn/F
d'fholaínn/F
d'fhorálainn/J
d'fhormáidínn/F
d'fhótachóipeálainn/J
d'fhothainínn/F
d'fhrithingínn/F
d'fhuilínn/F
d'fhuipeálainn/J
d'iarnálainn/JU
d'ídínn/FU
d'imoibrínn/FU
d'infheistínn/FU
d'íobraínn/FU
d'iomlaoidínn/FU
d'ionannaínn/FU
d'ionramhálainn/JU
d'ionsamhlaínn/FU
d'íoslódálainn/JU
d'oighrínn/FU
d'óraínn/FU
d'uaislínn/FU
d'uiscínn/FU
dambálaim/USI
dánaím/USC
dealbhaím/USC
deilbhím/USC
déileálaim/USI
dhallraínn/FU
dhambálainn/JU
dhathaínn/FU
dhearscnaínn/FU
dhéileálainn/JU
dheonaínn/FU
dhíbrínn/FU
dhíchóimeálainn/JU
dhífhabhtaínn/FU
dhílódálainn/JU
dhílsínn/FU
dhiogálainn/JU
dhíphacálainn/JU
dhíscínn/FU
dhochraínn/FU
dhópálainn/JU
dhraenálainn/JU
dhraoibeálainn/JU
dhreasaínn/FU
dhruileálainn/JU
dhumpálainn/JU
dhustálainn/JU
diasraím/USC
díchóimeálaim/USI
díchruthaím/USC
díhiodráitím/USC
dílódálaim/USI
diogálaim/USI
díotchúisím/USC
díphacálaim/USI
diurnaím/USC
dópálaim/USI
dorchaím/USC
draenálaim/USI
draoibeálaim/USI
druileálaim/USI
dúisím/USC
dumpálaim/USI
dustálaim/USI
eachtraínn/F
éagnaím/HUC
éalaínn/F
easanálaím/HUC
éascaínn/F
éigním/HUC
éirínn/F
eisreachtaím/HUC
eitlínn/F
eitseálaim/HUI
eitseálainn/J
faghraím/USC
fallaingím/USC
faoileálaim/USI
féichiúnaím/USC
fháinnínn/FU
fhaoileálainn/JU
fheabhsaínn/FU
fheisínn/FU
fhíoraínn/FU
fho-ordaínn/FU
fhodhálainn/JU
fhoilsínn/FU
fhorálainn/JU
fhorchéimnínn/FU
fhorualaínn/FU
fhótachóipeálainn/JU
fhuaimnínn/FU
fhuipeálainn/JU
fíním/USC
fithisím/USC
fodhálaim/USI
foghraím/USC
folmhaím/USC
forálaim/USI
formhéadaím/USC
fótachóipeálaim/USI
fothainím/USC
fruilím/USC
fuinnmhím/USC
fuipeálaim/USI
galaím/USC
gardálaim/USI
gathaím/USC
ghalraínn/FU
ghardálainn/JU
ghiosálainn/JU
ghlanmheabhraínn/FU
ghligleálainn/JU
ghothálainn/JU
ghrábhálainn/JU
ghránaínn/FU
ghrátálainn/JU
ghreasálainn/JU
ghrúpálainn/JU
giorraím/USC
giosálaim/USI
gligleálaim/USI
glónraím/USC
gothálaim/USI
grábhálaim/USI
grádaím/USC
grátálaim/USI
greasálaim/USI
grinním/USC
grúpálaim/USI
guthaím/USC
haigleálaim/I
haigleálainn/J
iarnaínn/F
ílím/HUC
imínn/F
imrím/HUC
inbhéartaínn/F
inréimním/HUC
iomadaím/HUC
iomardaínn/F
iompórtálainn/J
ion-análaím/HUC
ionduchtaím/HUC
ionphlandaínn/F
ionramhálaim/HUI
iontrálainn/J
íoslódálaim/HUI
íslím/HUC
labálainn/J
ládálaim/I
láimhseálainn/J
lainseálaim/I
lamhálainn/J
lánaím/C
landálaim/I
lansaínn/F
leacaím/C
leictreaphlátálainn/J
leictrím/C
léirínn/F
líneálaim/I
líním/C
linseálainn/J
liostálaim/I
liúdrálainn/J
lódálaim/I
lodraím/C
lóisteálainn/J
lonnaínn/F
luachálaim/I
luasghéaraím/C
lúbálainn/J
lútálaim/I
machnaím/SC
máinneálainn/J
mairgnínn/F
máirseálaim/SI
malgamaím/SC
mámálainn/J
mapálaim/SI
marcálainn/J
martraím/SC
meabhlaínn/F
meaitseálaim/SI
meanmnaím/SC
meirdrím/SC
meirtnínn/F
mháinneálainn/J
mhámálainn/J
mhaothaínn/F
mharcálainn/J
mheasúnaínn/F
mhineastrálainn/J
mhionleasaínn/F
mhothaínn/F
mineastrálainn/J
míntírím/SC
miondealaínn/F
miotaím/SC
monaplaím/SC
mótaraínn/F
muilleálaim/SI
muirním/SC
naomhainmním/C
neartaínn/F
nótálainn/J
nuachóirím/C
ofrálaim/HUI
olaím/HUC
optamaínn/F
ornaím/HUC
pacálaim/USI
paisteálaim/USI
parsálaim/USI
pearsantaím/USC
péireálaim/USI
phábhálainn/JU
pháirceálainn/JU
phánálainn/JU
phasálainn/JU
phéireálainn/JU
phíceálainn/JU
phionósaínn/FU
phíosálainn/JU
phlandálainn/JU
phlátálainn/JU
phleanálainn/JU
phocálainn/JU
phóitseálainn/JU
phramsálainn/JU
phrásálainn/JU
phrímeálainn/JU
phróiseálainn/JU
phróisínn/FU
phuinseálainn/JU
píceálaim/USI
píosálaim/USI
plandálaim/USI
plátálaim/USI
pleanálaim/USI
pocálaim/USI
póilíním/USC
póitseálaim/USI
pramsálaim/USI
prásálaim/USI
prímeálaim/USI
príobháidím/USC
próiseálaim/USI
puinseálaim/USI
rácálaim/I
rácálainn/J
rámhaím/C
rásálaim/I
rásálainn/J
reáchtálaim/I
reáchtálainn/J
réadaím/C
réamhdhátaínn/F
rialaím/C
rigeálaim/I
rigeálainn/J
rinseálaim/I
rinseálainn/J
roghnaím/C
rothaínn/F
rútálaim/I
rútálainn/J
sacálaim/SI
sacálainn/J
saibhseálaim/SI
saibhseálainn/J
sáimhrím/SC
samhlaím/SC
samplálaim/SI
samplálainn/J
saoirsínn/F
satlaím/SC
scarbhálaim/I
scarbhálainn/J
sceimhlím/C
sceitseálaim/I
scinceálaim/I
scinceálainn/J
scipeálaim/I
scórálaim/I
scórálainn/J
screamhaínn/F
scrioblálaim/I
scuabálaim/I
scuabálainn/J
seadaím/SC
seansálaim/SI
séimhím/SC
seirbheálaim/SI
seirbheálainn/J
shaibhseálainn/J
sháimhrínn/F
shatlaínn/F
sheiceálainn/J
shíolaínn/F
shluaisteálainn/J
shnasaínn/F
shrathaínn/F
shúisteálainn/J
síolaínn/F
sioncóipím/SC
siúntaím/SC
slatálaim/SI
slatálainn/J
smachtaínn/F
smeadrálaim/I
smúdálaim/I
smúdálainn/J
snasaím/SC
sóinseálaim/SI
sóisialaím/SC
sonraínn/F
spágálaim/I
spágálainn/J
spásálaim/I
spídím/C
spladhsálaim/I
spladhsálainn/J
spúinseálaim/I
sruthaím/SC
stálaínn/F
stampálaim/I
stampálainn/J
stíleálaim/I
stílím/C
stórálaim/I
stórálainn/J
struipeálaim/I
suaraím/SC
suimeálaim/SI
suimeálainn/J
suiteálaim/SI
tábálaim/USI
tadhlaím/USC
taisrím/USC
tapaím/USC
tapálaim/USI
tarrthálaim/USI
tatuálaim/USI
téaltaím/USC
teistím/USC
thábálainn/JU
thabhaínn/FU
thalmhaínn/FU
tharrthálainn/JU
theibínn/FU
thiargálainn/JU
thoibhínn/FU
thóstálainn/JU
threisínn/FU
thrusálainn/JU
tiargálaim/USI
tiontaím/USC
tointeálaim/USI
toirchím/USC
tóstálaim/USI
trasfhoirmím/USC
treorálaim/USI
triantánaím/USC
trusálaim/USI
tuairiscím/USC
uachtaínn/F
uasghrádaím/HUC
umhlaím/HUC
vacsaínínn/F
válsálaim/I
vearnaiseálaim/I
vearnaiseálainn/J
